Massachusetts, session 194th, H3493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of Chapter 25A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Qualified RPS resources” and inserting in 
place thereof the following definition:- 
“Qualified RPS resource”, a renewable energy generating source, as defined in 
subsection (c) or subsection (d) of section 11F, that has: (i) installed a qualified energy storage 
system at its facility; or (ii) commenced operation on or after January 1, 2019, provided, 
however, that a qualified RPS resource that commenced operation prior to January 1, 2019 shall 
be considered to have the commercial operation date of when the resource is co-located with a 
qualified energy storage system that commenced operation after January 1, 2019 and having a 
minimum nominal useful energy capacity of not less than 25 per cent of the nameplate power 
rating of the qualified RPS resource, or when the qualified RPS resource is contractually paired 
with a qualified energy storage system that commenced operation after January 1, 2019 and 

of 2 13 having a minimum nominal useful energy capacity of not less than 25 per cent of the nameplate 
power rating of the qualified RPS resource for 4 hours.